Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 3

Dependents of Incompetents [Repealed]

34-4-301 — 34-4-310.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§34-4-301 —34-4-310 (Code 1858, §§ 3708-3714 (deriv. Acts 1824, ch. 2, §§ 1-3, 1851-1852, ch. 57, §§ 1, 2, 5), 3715; Shan., §§ 5478-5485; Acts 1927, ch. 28, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 9639-9646; mod. Code 1932, §§ 9652-9654; Acts 1941, ch. 136, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 9652; Acts 1959, ch. 209, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1965, ch. 38, §§ 20, 48; impl. am. Acts 1976, ch. 529, § 1; Acts 1979, ch. 366, § 16; 1980, ch. 499, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.) §§ 34-501 — 34-503, 34-505 — 34-512), concerning dependents of incompetents, was repealed by Acts 1992, ch. 794, § 50, effective January 1, 1993. For new law concerning guardianship and conservatorship, see chs. 1-3 of this title.